Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-1550
Financial exploitation; notification; immunity.

(1) If an insurer or trained individual reasonably believes financial exploitation of an eligible adult may have occurred, has been attempted, or is being attempted, the insurer or trained individual may notify a permissible third party. Notification to a permissible third party is not required prior to any insurer's, trained individual's, director's, or relevant agency's review or investigation of financial exploitation.

(2) Insurers and trained individuals shall not notify a permissible third party if the insurer or trained individual reasonably suspects that such permissible third party has financially exploited or otherwise abused the eligible adult.

(3) An insurer or trained individual who, acting reasonably and in good faith, complies with this section shall be immune from any administrative or civil liability that might otherwise arise from such notification.

Laws 2026, LB967, § 20.
July 18, 2026